Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Subpart 3 Municipal Elections Conducted by Counties

21-2-45.
Authorization to create joint county-municipal boards of elections and boards of elections and registration; authorization for county to conduct elections.

The General Assembly may by local Act create a joint county-municipal board of elections in any county of this state for that county and any municipality located wholly or partially within that county and empower the board with the powers and duties of the election superintendent of that county and municipality with regard to the conduct of primaries and elections. Such board shall consist of not fewer than three members.

The General Assembly may by local Act create a joint county-municipal board of elections and registration in any county of this state for that county and any municipality located wholly or partially within that county and empower the board with the powers and duties of the election superintendent of that county and municipality with regard to the conduct of primaries and elections and empower the board with the powers and duties of the registrars and board of registrars of that municipality and county with regard to the registration of voters and absentee-balloting procedures. Such board shall consist of not fewer than three members.

The governing authority of any municipality may authorize any county within which that municipality wholly or partially lies to conduct any or all elections held pursuant to this chapter. In the event a municipality shall by ordinance authorize such county to conduct elections, such municipality may request such county to perform any or all of the functions:

That the county shall perform all duties as superintendent of elections as specified under this chapter;

That the county shall perform all duties as superintendent of elections as specified under this chapter, with the exception of the qualification of candidates; or

That the county shall lease or loan any or all of its election equipment to the municipality for the purpose of conducting municipal elections without any responsibility on the part of the county for the actual conduct of the municipal election.

With reference to any election, such municipality shall pay such county all costs incurred in performing those functions which the municipality has requested the county to perform; and, unless otherwise authorized, such county shall only perform those functions specifically enumerated in the contract. Such county shall have authority to conduct elections in any and all counties in which any part of such municipality may lie.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 680, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 772, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 3/SB 92.

21-2-45.1.
Special elections on bonded debt; publication; date; discount.

The governing authority of a county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to incur bonded debt in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of Georgia shall call a special election to be held on a certain day for the purpose of submitting to the electorate the question of whether such bonded debt shall be incurred. The governing authority shall publish notice of such election once a week for a period of four weeks immediately preceding the day of the election in a newspaper which publishes the sheriff’s advertisements for the county containing all or the largest part of the area of the county, municipality, or political subdivision involved. Such notice shall specify (1) the date of the election and the question to be submitted to the electorate, and (2) the principal amount of bonds to be issued, the purpose for which such bonds are to be issued, the interest rate or rates such bonds are to bear, and the amount of principal to be paid in each year during the life of such bonds; provided, however, that the governing authority, in lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which such bonds are to bear, may specify in the notice that such bonds when issued will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest as stated in the notice or that, in the event such bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, none of such rates will exceed the maximum rates stated in the notice.

The date of a municipal bond election shall be specified by the governing authority of the municipality. Such date shall not be less than 30 days after call of such bond election. The municipality shall immediately transmit a copy of such notice to the Secretary of State.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall prohibit the issuer from selling such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in the notice of the election.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-45.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 817, § 2/HB 1098.

Cross references.

Additional provisions regarding bonded debt, §

36-82-1

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).